Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 21 Outdoor Advertising Control Act of 2020
54-21-107. Acquisition by commissioner of outdoor advertising devices along the interstate and primary highway systems.

The commissioner is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or condemnation, and to pay just compensation upon the removal of the following outdoor advertising devices in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary highway systems:

Those lawfully in existence on April 4, 1972; and

Those lawfully erected on or after April 4, 1972.

Compensation is authorized to be made only for the following:

The taking from the owner of the outdoor advertising device of all right, title, leasehold, and interest in the outdoor advertising device; and

The taking from the owner of the real property on which the outdoor advertising device is located, of the right to erect and maintain the outdoor advertising device on the property.

If funds other than federal funds are used, the state shall follow the following order of purchasing priorities:

Volunteer nonconforming outdoor advertising devices;

Hardship situations;

Normal value signs;

Signs in areas that are designated scenic or parkway;

Product advertising on:

Rural interstate;

Rural primary; and

Urban areas;

Non-tourist-oriented directional advertising; and

Tourist-oriented devices.

All funds other than federal funds, acquired by the state from whatever source for the purpose of acquiring nonconforming outdoor advertising devices, must be appropriated by the general assembly to the department and shall not be earmarked for acquisitions at any particular location.

Funds obtained from private sources not appropriated within one (1) year revert to the donor.

Upon funds being made available, owners of outdoor advertising device must be notified of the availability of the funds for the purpose of volunteering nonconforming outdoor advertising devices for purchase by the state.

Upon the request of the commissioner, the owner of the outdoor advertising devices and the owner of the property upon which the outdoor advertising device is located who are seeking compensation as provided under subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and (B) shall present evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that the outdoor advertising device in question was in existence or lawfully erected, as the case may be, on, before, or after the appropriate dates set out in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2). Except by court order, the commissioner shall not make any payment under subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and (B) until the proof has been presented. Notwithstanding this chapter, those outdoor advertising devices legally in existence on April 4, 1972, are entitled to remain in place and in use until compensation for removal has been made as provided in this section.

In determining whether any outdoor advertising device is lawful or unlawful, any failure to have obtained a license or permit, or to have attached a permit, or failure to have complied with setback requirements is not a cause for declaring any outdoor advertising device unlawful. Any person having constructed, erected, operated, used, maintained, or having caused or permitted any outdoor advertising device to be constructed, erected, operated, used, or maintained, shall pay the fee prescribed by § 54-21-104; provided, that the outdoor advertising device was erected prior to April 4, 1972.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-108. Restrictions on outdoor advertising devices adjacent to state highways.

Control of outdoor advertising devices, as provided in §§ 54-21-103 and 54-21-104, is extended to outdoor advertising devices located beyond six hundred sixty feet (660') of the edge of the right-of-way of the federal-aid interstate or primary systems outside of urban areas erected with the purpose of their message being read from the main traveled ways of the systems. Such outdoor advertising devices are prohibited, regardless of whether located in commercial or industrial areas, unless they are of a class or type allowed under existing law within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the edge of the right-of-way of the systems outside of commercial or industrial areas.

Those outdoor advertising devices lawfully erected prior to July 1, 1976, but prohibited as of July 1, 1976, by subsection (a) shall be removed upon the payment of just compensation in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as outdoor advertising devices lawfully erected within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the edge of the right-of-way of the federal-aid interstate and primary systems outside of commercial and industrial areas.

Signs lawfully in existence on October 22, 1965, determined by the commissioner, subject to the concurrence of the secretary of transportation of the United States, to be landmark signs, including signs on farm structures or natural surfaces, of historic or artistic significance, the preservation of which would be consistent with the purposes of this section, are not required to be removed.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-109. Damage, destruction, or removal of signs or markers on state highway system.

A person shall not erect any sign, or affix another sign to or on any sign erected under the authority of the department, on any right-of-way of any state highway without authorization from the department.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-110. Information for traveling public.

In order to provide information in the specific interest of the traveling public, the commissioner is authorized to maintain maps and to permit informational directories and advertising pamphlets to be made available at safety rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the state and providing other information considered desirable.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-111. Power of commissioner to enforce provisions — Rulemaking.

The commissioner is given authority to and shall, within sixty (60) days of June 22, 2020, begin promulgating and enforcing only those rules as necessary to carry out this chapter and 23 U.S.C. § 131; provided, that the commissioner by rule shall establish procedures for accepting and resolving written complaints related to signs that are subject to this chapter. The rules must include:

A process to make information available describing the department's procedures for complaint investigation and resolution, including making information about the procedures available on the department's website;

A system to prioritize complaints so that the most serious complaints receive attention before less serious complaints; and

A procedure for compiling and reporting detailed annual statistics about complaints.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-112. Commissioner's authority to enter on property without penalty.

The commissioner and all employees under the commissioner's direction, in the performance of their functions and duties under this chapter, may enter into and upon any property, without penalty, upon which an outdoor advertising device is located and make examinations and surveys as may be relevant or dispose of the outdoor advertising device when disposal is provided for under this chapter.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-113. Commissioner's authority to enter into agreement with secretary of transportation.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to enter into agreements with the secretary of transportation of the United States regarding the definition of unzoned industrial and commercial areas; and regarding the size, lighting, and spacing of outdoor advertising devices that may be erected and maintained within six hundred sixty feet (660') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way within the areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems that are zoned industrial or commercial under the authority of state or local law, or in unzoned industrial or commercial areas that may be permitted in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the commissioner and the secretary of transportation of the United States. In any agreement entered into with the secretary of transportation, the commissioner reserves the right to renegotiate or make whatever modifications are necessary to conform to any subsequent amendments to the federal Highway Beautification Act of 1965, compiled in 23 U.S.C. §§ 131, 136, and 319. Any modification of the agreement with the United States department of transportation that the commissioner signed on or about November 11, 1971, or any subsequent agreement becomes effective only upon passage of an act authorizing the modification by the general assembly.

The commissioner is authorized to execute a modification of the agreement signed on or about November 11, 1971, to change the maximum area for any one (1) outdoor advertising device from one thousand two hundred square feet (1,200 sq. ft.) to seven hundred seventy-five square feet (775 sq. ft.); to reduce the optional maximum square footage of outdoor advertising devices authorized in counties having a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) from three thousand square feet (3,000 sq. ft.) to one thousand two hundred square feet (1,200 sq. ft.); to modify the agreement to change the minimum spacing of outdoor advertising devices on the interstate system and controlled access highways on the primary system from five hundred feet (500') to one thousand feet (1,000') where the same are not separated by buildings or other obstructions, so that only one (1) outdoor advertising device is visible from the highway at any one (1) time; to change the minimum spacing on noncontrolled access highways on the primary system outside the corporate limits of a municipality from three hundred feet (300') to five hundred feet (500'); and to change the minimum distance from an interchange, or intersection at grade, on the interstate system or controlled access highways on the primary system, outside incorporated cities, from five hundred feet (500') to one thousand feet (1,000'). Inside the corporate limits of a municipality, the distance between signs remains one hundred feet (100'). Permits issued prior to any change authorized for outdoor advertising devices or for outdoor advertising devices subsequently erected pursuant to the permit, that meet size, lighting, spacing, and zoning criteria are unaffected.

The commissioner is further authorized to change the definition of an unzoned commercial or industrial area to provide that only those areas on which there is located one (1) or more permanent structures within which a commercial or an industrial business is actively conducted, and that are equipped with all customary utilities facilities and open to the public regularly or regularly used by employees of the business as their principal work station, or that, due to the nature of the business, are equipped, staffed, and accessible to the public as is customary, may be so defined.

The commissioner is authorized to execute a modification of the agreement signed on or about November 11, 1971, to change the minimum distance from an interchange, or intersection, at grade, on the interstate system or controlled access highway on the primary system, outside incorporated cities, to five hundred feet (500') when the interchange or intersection is within two thousand five hundred feet (2,500') of an interchange or intersection, at grade, of a welcome station. This distance may be measured from that side of the interstate or controlled access highway on which the outdoor advertising is to be located if a determination is made by the commissioner that there exists a geographical feature or foliage in the median of the highway that would substantially block visibility of such outdoor advertising device from any lane of highway on the opposite side of the median.

If the commissioner is formally notified by the appropriate federal offices of the United States department of transportation that as a result of any provision of this subsection (d), the state will lose federal funds or if a loss of federal funds occurs, then the provision is void and inoperative.

If this subsection (d) is found to be void and inoperative, or if notice is received from the United States department of transportation as provided in subdivision (d)(2), then any outdoor advertising device placed pursuant to this subsection (d) must be removed immediately by and at the expense of the owner. Failure to remove the outdoor advertising device renders the sign a public nuisance and § 54-21-105 applies. Nothing in this subsection (d) grants an absolute right in the placement of an outdoor advertising device or makes the state in any way liable under this subsection (d), if this subsection (d) is found in violation of any federal regulations as provided in subdivision (d)(2).

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-114. Exceptions.

This chapter does not apply to signs or markers identifying the location or depth of underground communications and power cables, water mains, gas transmission lines, and other utility facilities located within or without the boundary of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway systems in the state.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-115. Outdoor advertising on certain interstate highways prohibited — Penalty — Exceptions.

No outdoor advertising device shall be erected or continued in use for the purpose of having its message read from the main traveled ways of Interstate 26 from State Route 1 in Sullivan County to State Route 67 in Washington County (formerly Interstate 181), except those portions within the boundaries of an incorporated municipality on March 3, 1994, Interstate 440 in Davidson County, Interstate 640 in Knox County, or the section of State Route 840 in Williamson County from State Route 246 to one (1) mile from the intersection with State Route 100. Failure to comply with this section renders the outdoor advertising device a nuisance, subject to immediate disposal, removal, or destruction and subject to the civil penalty and remedies provided in § 54-21-105. Valid permits for outdoor advertising devices located along Interstate 640 in Knox County issued prior to May 13, 1982, remain valid after May 13, 1982, and the holders of the permits are permitted to construct, reconstruct, maintain, or repair the outdoor advertising devices according to the original application for which a permit was issued. Valid permits for outdoor advertising devices located along Interstate 26 from State Route 1 in Sullivan County to State Route 67 in Washington County (formerly Interstate 181), issued prior to March 3, 1994, remain valid after March 3, 1994, and the holders of the permits are permitted to construct, reconstruct, maintain, or repair the outdoor advertising devices according to the original application for which a permit was issued.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

54-21-116. Vegetation control permits and fees.

The commissioner shall issue to the owners or holders of lawfully issued outdoor advertising device permits, which definition includes those described as legal conforming, grandfathered, and nonconforming outdoor advertising devices in federal regulations, when the face of the outdoor advertising device is generally visible to occupants of vehicles from the main traveled ways of the system on the date of erection, permits to remove, block cut, or trim vegetation located on the right-of-way adjacent to the outdoor advertising device and replace the vegetation as directed, whenever the vegetation prevents clear visibility for a distance not to exceed five hundred yards (500 yds.) to occupants of vehicles using the main traveled ways of the controlled systems. Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, vegetation that, on the date of erection of the outdoor advertising device, blocks the view of the outdoor advertising device, in whole or in any part, for a distance not to exceed five hundred yards (500 yds.), to occupants of vehicles using the main traveled ways, is not eligible for removal under a vegetation control permit. The maximum area to be controlled shall not exceed five hundred feet (500'). The regional engineering director for the department shall issue a vegetation control permit where all criteria are met, following submission of information specified and a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each face involved. Vegetation control permits will be issued upon payment of a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per face for supervision of the work. All fees received by the commissioner under this section shall be deposited to the highway fund for the administration of this part. Each subsequent year a maintenance permit may be purchased for fifty dollars ($50.00) to provide annual maintenance at any one (1) location that is consistent with the original vegetation control permit. Vegetation permits issued pursuant to the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, compiled in this chapter as it existed prior to June 22, 2020, shall be reinstated under chapter 706 of the Public Acts of 2020. Alternatively, the owner of the device may apply for a new vegetation control permit, and the department shall issue the permit.

No later than thirty (30) days from June 22, 2020, the commissioner shall develop and make available any forms necessary to apply for a permit and shall begin accepting and considering such applications. The commissioner shall use best efforts to process an application for a permit, in accordance with the rules of the department, within no greater than thirty (30) days after a completed application is received. If the application is incomplete or defective on its face, the commissioner shall notify an applicant in writing no later than fifteen (15) days of receipt of the filed application of its incomplete or defective status, and indicate the information or documentation that is needed to complete or correct the application. If a decision to approve or deny the application cannot be made within thirty (30) days after receipt of the completed or corrected application, the commissioner shall contact the applicant prior to the expiration of the thirty (30) days to provide an explanation of the reasons why additional time is needed to process the application. If the application is approved, the applicant shall notify the commissioner of the date on which the applicant wishes the permit to be issued. The applicant shall complete the authorized vegetation control within the time period specified in the permit, and in any event, the applicant shall complete the vegetation control within one (1) year after the date on which the application was approved or the application approval and permit is void.

One (1) vegetation control permit fee must be waived for those owners who voluntarily remove a nonconforming outdoor advertising device. If the nonconforming outdoor advertising device to be removed is not at least one hundred fifty square feet (150 sq. ft.) in size, two (2) nonconforming outdoor advertising devices must be removed to authorize waiver. The latter applies only when the outdoor advertising device around which control is to occur is larger than three hundred square feet (300 sq. ft.).

This waiver shall not be used as evidence in any future eminent domain proceeding relating to nonconforming outdoor advertising devices.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it is the legislative intent that issuance of permits and carrying out of the work pursuant to the permits are lawful activities and shall not be construed as violating any provision of law.

The commissioner may revoke, suspend, or modify any vegetation control permit for cause, including violation of any terms or conditions of the permit.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former Title 54, Chapter 21, 54-21-101—54-21-123 (Acts 1972, ch. 655, §§ 1-8, 10-17; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 69, § 1; Acts 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1975, ch. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 431, § 1; Acts 1976, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 235, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 54-2601-54-2617; Acts 1980, ch. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 837, § 2; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1982, ch. 865, § 8; 1982, ch. 932, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 133, §§ 1-6; 1984, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 22, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1990, ch. 936, § 1; 1994, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 63, § 1; 2001, ch. 357, § 1; 2006, ch. 678, § 1; 2007, ch. 76, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 427, §§ 1-9; 2008, ch. 1155, §§ 1-4; 2009, ch. 451, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 516, § 1; 2012, ch. 547, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 401, § 1; 2014, ch. 823, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 852, § 1; 2017, ch. 398, § 1; 2018, ch. 683, §§ 1-3; 2019, ch. 169, §§ 1-4) concerning the Billboard Regulation and Control Act of 1972, was repealed by Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 8 which enacted a new chapter 21, effective June 22, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.